Nebraska, session 109, LB934.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 32-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-101 Sections 32-101 to 32-1552 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Election Act.
Sec. 2. The members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission
from public service commissioner district number one, public service
commissioner district number three, and public service commissioner
district number five shall be elected at the statewide general election
in 2028 and every four years thereafter. The members from public service
commissioner district number two and public service commissioner district
number four shall be elected at the statewide general election in 2028,
the statewide general election in 2030, and each four years thereafter.
Each member shall serve until the member's successor is elected. Each
member shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.
Sec. 3. Section 32-567, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-567 Vacancies in office shall be filled as follows:
(1) In state and judicial district offices and in the membership of
any board or commission created by the state when no other method is
provided, by the Governor;
(2) In county offices, by the county board;
(3) In the membership of the county board, by the county clerk,
county attorney, and county treasurer;
(4) In the membership of the city council, according to section
32-568 or 32-569, as applicable;
(5) In township offices, by the township board or, if there are two
or more vacancies on the township board, by the county board;
(6) In offices in public power and irrigation districts, according
to section 70-615;
(7) In offices in natural resources districts, according to section
2-3215;
-2-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
(8) In offices in community college areas, according to section
85-1514;
(9) In offices in educational service units, according to section
79-1217;
(10) In offices in hospital districts, according to section 23-3534;
(11) In offices in metropolitan utilities districts, according to
section 14-2104;
(12) In membership on airport authority boards, according to section
3-502, 3-611, or 3-703, as applicable;
(13) In membership on the board of trustees of a road improvement
district, according to section 39-1607;
(14) In membership on the council of a municipal county, by the
council;
(15) For learning community coordinating councils, according to
section 32-546.01; and
(16) For regional metropolitan transit authority boards, according
to section 18-808; and .
(17) For members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission,
according to section 71-24,109.
Sec. 4. Section 32-813, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-813 (1) The names of all candidates and all proposals to be voted
upon at the general election shall be arranged upon the ballot in parts
separated from each other by bold lines in the order the offices and
proposals are set forth in this section. If any office is not subject to
the upcoming election, the office shall be omitted from the ballot and
the remaining offices shall move up so that the same relative order is
preserved. The order of any offices may be altered to allow for the best
utilization of ballot space in order to avoid printing a second ballot
when one ballot would be sufficient if an optical-scan ballot is used.
All proposals on the ballot submitted by a political subdivision shall
-3-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
follow all offices on the ballot submitted by a political subdivision.
(2)(a) If the election is in a year in which a President of the
United States is to be elected, the names and spaces for voting for
candidates for President and Vice President shall be entitled
Presidential Ticket in boldface type.
(b) The names of candidates for President and Vice President for
each political party shall be grouped together, and each group shall be
enclosed with brackets with the political party name next to the brackets
and one square or oval opposite the names in which the voter indicates
his or her choice.
(c) The names of candidates for President and Vice President who
have successfully petitioned on the ballot for the general election shall
be grouped together with the candidates appearing on the same petition
being grouped together, and each group shall be enclosed with brackets
with the words "By Petition" next to the brackets and one square or oval
opposite the names in which the voter indicates his or her choice.
(d) Beneath the names of the candidates for President and Vice
President certified by the officers of the national political party
conventions pursuant to section 32-712 and beneath the names of all
candidates for President and Vice President placed on the general
election ballot by petition, two write-in lines shall be provided in
which the voter may fill in the names of the candidates of his or her
choice. The lines shall be enclosed with brackets with one square or oval
opposite the names in which the voter indicates his or her choice. The
name appearing on the top line shall be considered to be the candidate
for President, and the name appearing on the second line shall be
considered to be the candidate for Vice President.
(3) The names and spaces for voting for candidates for United States
Senator if any are to be elected shall be entitled United States
Senatorial Ticket in boldface type.
(4) The names and spaces for voting for candidates for
-4-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
Representatives in Congress shall be entitled Congressional Ticket in
boldface type. Above the candidates' names, the office shall be
designated For Representative in Congress ...... District.
(5) The names and spaces for voting for candidates for the various
state officers shall be entitled State Ticket in boldface type. Each set
of candidates shall be separated by lines across the column, and above
each set of candidates shall be designated the office for which they are
candidates, arranged in the order prescribed by the Secretary of State.
The candidates for Governor of each political party receiving the highest
number of votes in the primary election shall be grouped together with
their respective candidates for Lieutenant Governor. Each group shall be
enclosed with brackets with the political party name next to the brackets
and one square or oval opposite the names in which the voter indicates
his or her choice for Governor and Lieutenant Governor jointly. The
candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor who have successfully
petitioned on the general election ballot shall be grouped together with
the candidates appearing on the same petition being grouped together.
Each group shall be enclosed with brackets with the words "By Petition"
next to the brackets and one square or oval opposite the names in which
the voter indicates his or her choice for Governor and Lieutenant
Governor jointly. Beneath the names of the candidates for Governor
nominated at a primary election by political party and their respective
candidates for Lieutenant Governor and beneath the names of all
candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor placed on the general
election ballot by petition, one write-in line shall be provided in which
the registered voter may fill in the name of the candidate for Governor
of his or her choice and one square or oval opposite the line in which
the voter indicates his or her choice for Governor.
(6) The names and spaces for voting for nonpartisan candidates shall
be entitled Nonpartisan Ticket in boldface type. The names of all
nonpartisan candidates shall appear in the order listed in this
-5-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
subsection, except that when using an optical-scan ballot, the order of
offices may be altered to allow for the best utilization of ballot space
to avoid printing a second ballot when one ballot would be sufficient:
(a) Legislature;
(b) State Board of Education;
(c) Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska;
(d) Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(e) Judge of the Supreme Court;
(f) Judge of the Court of Appeals;
(g) Judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court;
(h) Judge of the District Court;
(i) Judge of the Separate Juvenile Court;
(j) Judge of the County Court; and
(k) Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission; and
(l) (k) County officers in the order prescribed by the election
commissioner or county clerk.
(7) The names and spaces for voting for the various county offices
and for measures submitted to the county vote only or in only a part of
the county shall be entitled County Ticket in boldface type. If the
election commissioner or county clerk deems it advisable, the measures
may be submitted on a separate ballot if using a paper ballot or on
either side of an optical-scan ballot if the ballot is placed in a ballot
envelope or sleeve before being deposited in a ballot box.
(8) The candidates for office in the precinct only or in the city or
village only shall be printed on the ballot, except that if the election
commissioner or county clerk deems it advisable, candidates for these
offices may be submitted on a separate ballot if using a paper ballot or
on either side of an optical-scan ballot if the ballot is placed in a
ballot envelope or sleeve before being deposited in a ballot box.
(9) All proposals submitted by initiative or referendum and
proposals for constitutional amendments shall be placed on a separate
-6-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
ballot when a paper ballot is used which requires that the ballot after
being voted be folded before being deposited in a ballot box. When an
optical-scan ballot is used which requires a ballot envelope or sleeve in
which the ballot after being voted is placed before being deposited in a
ballot box, initiative or referendum proposals and proposals for
constitutional amendments may be placed on either side of the ballot,
shall be separated by a bold line, and shall follow all other offices
placed on the same side of the ballot. Initiative or referendum proposals
and constitutional amendments so arranged shall constitute a separate
ballot. Proposals for constitutional amendments proposed by the
Legislature shall be placed on the ballot as provided in sections 49-201
to 49-211.
Sec. 5. Section 71-24,109, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-24,109 (1) For purposes of providing the necessary registration
and regulation of persons that possess, manufacture, distribute, deliver,
and dispense cannabis for medical purposes pursuant to the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission
is created.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The commission shall consist of no fewer than three and no more
than five members; .
(b) (3) The three members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
shall be ex officio members of the commission, serving terms and
receiving appointment in the same manner as provided in section 53-105; .
(c) (4) The Governor may appoint two additional members, subject to
confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature, to
serve with the members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission as
members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission. The members
appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve six-year terms; and .
(d) (5) The Governor may reappoint members of the commission,
-7-

LB934 LB934
2026 2026
subject to approval by a majority of the members elected to the
Legislature.
(3) Beginning January 4, 2029, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Commission shall consist of five members nominated at the statewide
primary election and elected at the statewide general election. One
member shall be elected from each of the five public service commissioner
districts as provided in section 2 of this act. Vacancies shall be filled
by appointment by the Governor.
Sec. 6. Original section 32-813, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, section 32-567, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
and sections 32-101 and 71-24,109, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-8-